Mississippi, session 2026, SB2698.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 9-12-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 9-12-3.  (1)  The Attorney General shall designate * * * two (2) three (3) attorneys to serve as prosecuting attorneys for any cause of action within the jurisdiction of the Capitol Complex Improvement District (CCID) inferior court.  The prosecuting attorneys may be employees of the Office of the Attorney General or contracted by the Attorney General for such purposes.  The attorneys shall prosecute cases in the court provided for the CCID inferior court and also in the same manner and with the same authority of law provided for district attorneys and county prosecuting attorneys by filing an indictment or any other criminal action that accrues or occurs, in whole or in part, in the CCID. (2)  The Attorney General may appoint a full-time criminal investigator to serve as an investigator for any cause of action within the jurisdiction of the CCID inferior court.  Under this subsection, the Attorney General shall have the same authorizations and requirements of the appointing authority under Section 25-31-10.  The full-time criminal investigator shall receive compensation in an amount equal to the compensation paid to full-time criminal investigators in the Seventh Circuit Court District subject to available funds specifically appropriated by the Legislature. ( * * *23)  The * * * Hinds County District Attorney for the Seventh Circuit Court District shall be authorized to prosecute cases in the CCID inferior court.  The provisions of this section shall not be construed to prohibit or in any way limit the * * * Hinds County District Attorney for the Seventh Circuit Court District from filing an indictment or any other criminal action that occurred or accrued, in whole or in part, within the boundaries of the CCID. ( * * *34)  This section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2027. SECTION 2.  Section 25-32-4, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-32-4.  (1)  The public defender of the Seventh Circuit Court District may appoint three (3) full-time assistant public defenders who shall perform duties in the Seventh Circuit Court District and the Capitol Complex Improvement District (CCID) Inferior Court.  Such appointments shall be made in addition to those authorized as of July 1, 2023 in Section 25-32-3. (2)  (a)  The public defender of the Seventh Circuit Court District may appoint two (2) full-time assistant public defenders who shall perform duties in the CCID Inferior Court. (b)  The support staff for the full-time assistant public defenders appointed under this subsection shall receive compensation in an amount equal to the compensation paid to support staff in the Seventh Circuit Court District subject to available funds specifically appropriated by the Legislature. (3)  The full-time assistant public defenders appointed under this section shall receive compensation in an amount equal to the compensation paid to full-time assistant public defenders in the Seventh Circuit Court District subject to available funds specifically appropriated by the Legislature. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.